Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1443XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1443XD (3) 91
sc/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 35A.13, subsection 5, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
5. a. For each fiscal year that the balance of the trust
fund on July 1 is below fifty seventy-five million dollars,
the interest and earnings on moneys in the fund and the first
five hundred thousand dollars transferred pursuant to section
99G.39 from the lottery fund are appropriated to the commission
to be used to achieve the purposes of subsection 8. Moneys
appropriated to the commission under this paragraph that remain
unencumbered or unobligated at the end of the fiscal year shall
revert to the fund.
b. For each fiscal year that the balance of the trust fund
on July 1 is above fifty million dollars but the balance of the
fund was below fifty million dollars on July 1 of the previous
fiscal year, moneys transferred pursuant to section 99G.39 from
the lottery fund are appropriated to the commission to be used
to achieve the purposes of subsection 8. Moneys appropriated
to the commission under this paragraph that remain unencumbered
or unobligated at the end of the fiscal year shall revert to
the fund.
c. For each fiscal year that the balance of the trust fund
on July 1 is above fifty million dollars and the balance of
the fund was above fifty million dollars on July 1 of the
previous fiscal year, moneys equal to the net income the fund
received in the previous fiscal year are appropriated to the
commission to be used to achieve the purposes of subsection
8. Moneys appropriated to the commission under this paragraph
that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end of the
fiscal year shall revert to the fund. For the purposes of this
paragraph, “income” means moneys credited to the veterans trust
fund pursuant to subsection 2 and moneys transferred pursuant
to section 99G.39.
d. b. Notwithstanding paragraphs paragraph “a”, “b”, and
“c”, moneys credited to the war orphans educational assistance
account shall be expended as provided in subsection 9.
LSB 1443XD (3) 91
-1- sc/js 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
e. c. Notwithstanding paragraphs paragraph “a”, “b”,
and “c”, moneys transferred under subsection 6 to the county
commission of veteran affairs training program account shall be
expended as provided in section 35A.16.
Sec. 2. Section 99G.39, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. Two million five hundred thousand dollars in lottery
revenues shall be transferred each fiscal year to the veterans
trust fund established pursuant to section 35A.13 prior to
deposit of the lottery revenues in the general fund pursuant
to section 99G.40. However, if the balance of the veterans
trust fund is fifty million dollars or more, the moneys shall
be appropriated to the department for distribution to county
directors of veteran affairs, with fifty percent of the moneys
to be distributed equally to each county and fifty percent of
the moneys to be distributed to each county based upon the
population of veterans in the county, so long as the moneys
distributed to a county do not supplant moneys appropriated by
that county for the county director of veteran affairs, unless
the balance of the veterans trust fund is equal to or greater
than seventy-five million dollars at the beginning of the
fiscal year.